Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.145

Notification to offenders of changed requirements and ability to petition for relief from registration.

(1) The state patrol shall notify:

(a) Registered sex and kidnapping offenders of any change to the registration requirements, including the extinguishment of a legal obligation to register under RCW 9A.44.144;

(b) No less than annually, an offender having a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.143 for a sex offense or kidnapping offense committed when the offender was a juvenile of their ability to petition for relief from registration as provided in RCW 9A.44.140; and

(c) A school's or institution's designated recipient of records under RCW 9A.44.138 regarding the extinguishment of a student's legal obligation to register under RCW 9A.44.144.

(2) For economic efficiency, the state patrol may combine the notices in this section into one notice.

[ 2023 c 150 s 11; 2010 c 267 s 8; 2009 c 210 s 1; 1998 c 139 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 150: See note following RCW 9A.44.130.

Application—2010 c 267: See note following RCW 9A.44.128.